gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_7.aff
FLAG long
SFX c0   ébrer      èbre/n'l'm't'                   ébrer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   écer       èce/n'l'm't'                    écer                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   écher      èche/n'l'm't'                   écher               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   écrer      ècre/n'l'm't'                   écrer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éder       ède/n'l'm't'                    éder                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éger       ège/n'l'm't'                    éger                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   égler      ègle/n'l'm't'                   égler               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   égner      ègne/n'l'm't'                   égner               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   égrer      ègre/n'l'm't'                   égrer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éguer      ègue/n'l'm't'                   éguer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éler       èle/n'l'm't'                    éler                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   émer       ème/n'l'm't'                    émer                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éner       ène/n'l'm't'                    éner                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éper       èpe/n'l'm't'                    éper                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   équer      èque/n'l'm't'                   équer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   érer       ère/n'l'm't'                    érer                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éser       èse/n'l'm't'                    éser                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éter       ète/n'l'm't'                    éter                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   étrer      ètre/n'l'm't'                   étrer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   évrer      èvre/n'l'm't'                   évrer               po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   éyer       èye/n'l'm't'                    éyer                po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0   er         ons/n'l't'                      [^cg]er             po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0   écer       éçons/n'l't'                    écer                po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0   éger       égeons/n'l't'                   éger                po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0   er         ez/n'l'm'                       er                  po:impe po:2pl

# verbes en -eler, -eter : doublement des consonnes l ou t ------------------------------------------------------------
